Alaska statutes. Title 17. Food and Drugs.
Chapter 22. Use of Epinephrine in Emergency Situations.

Sec. 17.22.010.
Prescription, purchase, and administration of epinephrine by a trained individual.

An individual who is 18 years of age or older may obtain a prescription for, purchase, and, in an emergency situation, administer epinephrine using

an auto-injector, if the individual has successfully completed a training program approved by the department under AS

17.22.020(b)

; or

an ampule, if the individual has successfully completed a training program approved by the department under AS

17.22.020(c)

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 52 SLA 2010)

Sec. 17.22.020.
Approval of training programs.

The department shall adopt standards for the approval of training programs for the use of

epinephrine auto-injectors; and

epinephrine ampules.

The department shall approve an auto-injector training program that meets standards adopted under (a)(1) of this section. The standards must require an epinephrine auto-injector program to provide training in

techniques on how to recognize symptoms of severe asthmatic or allergic reactions, including anaphylaxis;

standards and procedures for the storage of epinephrine auto-injectors and administration of epinephrine using auto-injectors; and

emergency follow-up procedures.

The department shall approve an epinephrine ampule training program that meets standards adopted under (a)(2) of this section. The standards must require an epinephrine ampule program to provide training in

techniques on how to recognize symptoms of severe asthmatic or allergic reactions, including anaphylaxis;

standards and procedures for the storage of epinephrine ampules and administration of epinephrine using ampules; and

emergency follow-up procedures.

History.

(§ 1 ch 52 SLA 2010)

Sec. 17.22.030.
Applicability.

This chapter does not apply to a person who is authorized under another law to administer epinephrine or to a person who is prescribed epinephrine for personal use.

History.

(§ 1 ch 52 SLA 2010)

Sec. 17.22.040.
Liability of certified individual.

A claim for relief may not be brought against an individual who has successfully completed a training program approved by the department under AS

17.22.020

for an act or omission relating to the administration of epinephrine to another individual in an emergency situation if the individual who completed the training program acted in good faith under the authority granted by this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 52 SLA 2010)

Sec. 17.22.090.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“department” means the Department of Health and Social Services;

“emergency situation” means a circumstance where an individual experiences, or appears to experience, a severe asthmatic or allergic reaction, including anaphylaxis, that requires the administration of epinephrine to avoid severe injury or death and where a certified or licensed health care provider authorized to administer epinephrine is not reasonably available.

History.

(§ 1 ch 52 SLA 2010)